New York, session 2025-2026, A2094.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6304-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6304-b. State aid for community college day care centers. Each 4 community college within the state that has a day care center shall be 5 provided annually with state funds from the general fund for the purpose 6 of offsetting additional costs to such community colleges due to an 7 increase in the state minimum wage. Such additional funds shall match 8 any additional day care center operating costs associated with an 9 increase in the state minimum wage. The board of trustees of the commu- 10 nity college shall report to the state comptroller on an annual basis 11 the amount of such additional operating costs. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05680-01-5